Illinois, session 104th, SB2398.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-63 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-63 new)7    Sec. 25-63. Artificial intelligence restriction. A sports 8wagering licensee may not use artificial intelligence to:9        (1) track the sports wagers of an individual;10        (2) create an offer or promotion targeting a specific 11    individual; or12        (3) create a gambling product, such as a microbet. 13    For the purpose of this Section, "microbet" means a wager 14placed in an outcome or occurrence within a sporting event 15which may or may not be related to the ultimate result of the 16sporting event.